src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-poolaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - pǭļaz: # adjectives 175 'eng bare /est paljas /fin' - full paradigm
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Nom: [pǭļaz, pōļaz]
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Gen: paļļõ
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Par: [pǭļazt, pōļazt]
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Dat: paļļõn
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Ins: paļļõks
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Ill: [paļļõ, paļļõz]
     pǭļaz+A+Sg+Ela: paļļõst
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Nom: paļļõd
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Gen: paļļõd
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Par: paļļidi
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Dat: paļļõdõn
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Ins: paļļõdõks
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Ill: paļļiž
     pǭļaz+A+Pl+Ela: paļļist
